Arkansas, session 2025, HB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-12-101(a)(5), concerning the
Commissioner of State Lands as a voting member of the Arkansas Natural and
Cultural Resources Council, is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Commissioner of State Lands or his or her designee;

/s/Steele











*CRH091*
02-10-2025 13:54:06 CRH091